District of Columbia statutes.
33-425

Repealed

Partner’s interest in partnership — Profits and surplus.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 641, Pub. L. 87-709, § 26
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-125.
1973 Ed., § 41-325.